Utah statutes.
39-1-64.   Extension of licenses for members of National Guard and
reservists.
(1)  As used in this section, "license" means any license issued under:
(a)  Title 58, Occupations and Professions; and
(b)  Section 26-8a-302.
(2)  Any license held by a member of the National Guard or reserve component
of the armed forces that expires while the member is on active duty shall be
extended until 90 days after the member is discharged from active duty status.
(3)  The licensing agency shall renew a license extended under Subsection (2)
until the next date that the license expires or for the period that the
license is normally issued, at no cost to the member of the National Guard or
reserve component of the armed forces if all of the following conditions are
met:
(a)  the National Guard member or reservist requests renewal of the license
within 90 days after being discharged;
(b)  the National Guard member or reservist provides the licensing agency with
a copy of the member's or reservist's official orders calling the member or
reservist to active duty, and official orders discharging the member or
reservist from active duty; and
(c)  the National Guard member or reservist meets all the requirements
necessary for the renewal of the license, except the member or reservist need
not meet the requirements, if any, that relate to continuing education or
training.
(4)  The provisions of this section do not apply to regularly scheduled annual
training.
